incubator/tools/apertium-lex-acquisition/apertium-en-pt.pt.dix
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíamo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíamos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gia</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gia</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíeis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíei</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíeis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gias</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gia</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gias</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giam</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giam</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gia</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gia</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíssemos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíssemo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíssemos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gísseis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíssei</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gísseis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisses</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisses</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissem</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissem</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíramos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíramo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíramos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gira</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gira</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíreis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gírei</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gíreis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giras</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gira</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giras</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giram</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giram</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gira</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gira</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gidas</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gida</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gidos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gido</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gimos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gimo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gimos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gis</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gem</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gem</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamo</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamos</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>gir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
